dictsource/my_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Burmese

.replace
// Convert numbers
၀ 0
၁ 1
၂ 2
၃ 3
၄ 4
၅ 5
၆ 6
၇ 7
၈ 8
၉ 9

// punctuation
// ၊  , seems not necessary
// ။  .

.group က
      က      k
      က်      @  //vv ɛ
  _)  က  (_  ke //vv kə3
      ကျ      t@ //vv tɕ

.group    ျ
      ျ     j@ //vvɕ

.group    ွ
        ွ    wa

.group    ကျ
       ကျ    te //vv tɕ

.group    ခ
         ခ   kh

.group    ဂ
        ဂ   g

.group    ဃ
         ဃ   g

.group င
    င    N //vv ŋ
    င်    n

.group    စ
         စ   s

.group    ဆ
         ဆ   sh

.group   ဇ
         ဇ   z

.group    ဈ
         ဈ   z

.group    ည
          ည   N //vv ɲ

.group    ဉ
          ဉ   N //vv ɲ

.group    ဋ
         ဋ   t

.group    ဌ
         ဌ   th

.group    ဍ
         ဍ   t

.group    ဎ
         ဎ   d

.group    ဏ
         ဏ   n

.group    တ
         တ   t

.group    ထ
         ထ   th

.group    ဒ
         ဒ   d

.group    ဓ
         ဓ   d

.group    န
         န   n

.group    ပ
         ပ   p

.group    ဖ
         ဖ   ph

.group    ဗ
         ဗ   b

.group    ဘ
         ဘ   b

.group    မ
         မ   m

.group    ယ
         ယ   j

.group    ရ
         ရ   j

.group    လ
         လ   l

.group    ဝ
         ဝ   w

.group    သ
         သ   D //vv θ

.group    ဟ
         ဟ   h

.group    ဠ
         ဠ   l

.group    အ
         အ   @ // vv ə3

.group  ေ
       ေ    e3
    က) ေ    e3
    @) ေ    ke3

.group ိ
    ိ    i

.group ီ
    ီ    i1
.group ု
   ု    u3

.group ူ
  ူ    u1

.group ို
    ို    o

.group ာ
   ာ  ts
   ာ    e // vv ə

.group ါ
   ါ    e // vv ə

.group း
    း    2

.group  ော
    ော       au2
    ော်       o1
    ော့       o3
    ောင်     on4
    ောက်    on4
    ော်      au1
    ော့      au3
    ောင်     aun4


// TODO following should be added as additional characters
// after "normal letters" in letter groups and consumed
// together with them

.group ်
    ်    _|

.group  ့
     ့    _|

.group ဢ
    ဢ    a
.group  ံ
     ံ    a

.group ဪ
    ဪ    au

.group ဧ
    ဧ    e

.group ဨ
    ဨ    e

.group  ဵ
     ဵ    e
.group  ှ
     ှ    ha

.group ဤ
    ဤ    i
.group ဩ
    ဩ    o

.group ဣ
    ဣ    i

.group  ြ
     ြ    r

.group ဿ
    ဿ    s

.group ဦ
    ဦ    u

.group ဥ
    ဥ    u:

.group  ဲ
    ဲ   a
